Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.105

Automated kiosks.

For a secondhand dealer to utilize an automated kiosk to purchase secondhand property in this state, the automated kiosk must have the capability to:

(1) Collect all information required under RCW 19.60.020(1);

(2) Connect with a live customer service representative that can remotely verify the identity of the person engaged in the transaction;

(3) Compare the secondhand property purchased against a state or federal database of stolen items using the serial number, International Mobile Equipment Identity (IMEI), the mobile equipment identifier (MEID), or other unique identifying number assigned to the device by the manufacturer; and

(4) Securely store all secondhand property purchased.

[ 2017 c 169 s 4.]